Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0211.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1138a. (1) By not later than January 1, 2026, the department shall create a purple star program that, at a minimum, meets the requirements under subsection (2). (2) The purple star program created under subsection (1) must include, at a minimum, both of the following: (a) An application process for a public school to apply to receive a purple-star-program-school designation. (b) A process for the designation of a public school as a purple star program school that, at a minimum, meets the criteria under subsection (3). (3) A public school that meets at least all of the following qualifies for a purple-star-program-school designation under subsection (2): (a) The public school designates a staff member of the public school as a military liaison. The military liaison described in this subdivision must be charged with, at a minimum, all of the following: (i) Identifying military-connected pupils enrolled in the public school. (ii) Serving as the point of contact between other individuals at the public school and military-connected pupils and their families. (iii) Determining appropriate services available to military-connected pupils. (iv) Assisting in coordinating programs relevant to military-connected pupils. (v) Ensuring that military-connected pupils have access to appropriate counseling, mentoring, volunteering opportunities, and support services. (b) On the public school's website homepage, the public school maintains an easily accessible web page that includes resources for military-connected pupils and their families that includes at least all of the following information: (i) Information concerning relocation to, enrollment at, registration at, and the transference of records to the public school. (ii) Information regarding academic planning, course sequences, and advanced classes available at the public school. (iii) Information regarding counseling and other support services available for military-connected pupils enrolled at the public school. (iv) Information concerning the military liaison designated under subdivision (a) and the liaison's duties under that subdivision. (c) Maintains a transition program led by pupils, where appropriate, that assists military-connected pupils in transitioning to the public school. (d) Offers professional development for staff members of the public school on issues related to military-connected pupils. The professional development offered under this subdivision may be provided by a professional educator association in this state. (e) Offers at least 1 of the following initiatives: (i) A resolution showing support for military-connected pupils and their families. (ii) A recognition of a military-connected pupil or the family of a military-connected pupil each month with relevant events connected to this recognition hosted by the public school. (iii) A partnership with a branch of the armed forces that provides opportunities for members of the armed forces to volunteer at the public school, speak at an assembly, or host a field trip sponsored by the public school. (iv) Pupil-driven clubs and groups that show community-family engagement for military-connected pupils and their families. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Armed forces" means the United States Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard or other military force designated by Congress as a part of the Armed Forces of the United States, including the reserve components. The reserve components include, but are not limited to, the National Guard. (b) "Military-connected pupil" means a pupil enrolled in a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy who meets either of the following: (i) Is the family member of a current or former member of the armed forces. (ii) Was the family member of an individual who was a member of the armed forces and who was killed in the line of duty.